District of Columbia statutes.
25-407

Application for a brew pub permit.

(a)

The application for issuance or renewal of a brew pub permit shall include:

(1)

A copy of the applicant’s restaurant or tavern license, or a copy of the pending application for a license; and

(2)

A map showing the relation of the restaurant or tavern to the premises to be used to brew malt beverages.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959